srcV2/esu.lexc
LEXICON NounInflection
! -------------------------------------------------|
!              Absolutive Case Endings             |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                singular possessed                |                     plural possessed                 |                       dual possessed                   |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][SgUnpd]:%<&                  EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][PlUnpd]:%<%%%:(e)t&            EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][DuUnpd]:%<%%%:(e)k&              EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<%:(ng)i↞&       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)k↞&        EncliticOrEnd; ! 3SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞t&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<%:(ng)i↞t&      EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ket&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3PL possessor |
-[N][Abs][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞k&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–kek&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞kek&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–k̲a&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<%%%:(e)n↞ka&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ka&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–put&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–put&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞put&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1PL possessor |
-[N][Abs][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+p|.vut&     EncliticOrEnd;
-[N][Abs][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–puk&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–puk&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞puk&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+p|.vuk&     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞%%%:(e)n&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–ten&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ken&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–ci&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–ci&           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ci&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
-[N][Abs][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+c|.si&      EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Abs][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–tek&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–tek&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞tek&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+t|.sek&     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–ni&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–ni&           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ni&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 4SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–teng&       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–teng&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞teng&    EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
-[N][Abs][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+t|.seng&    EncliticOrEnd;
-[N][Abs][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–tek&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–tek&          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞tek&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+t|.sek&     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! -------------------------------------------------|
!              Relative Case Endings               |
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!               singular possessed                 |                    plural possessed                |               dual possessed                |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][SgUnpd]:%<%%%:(e)m&           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][PlUnpd]:%<%%%:(e)t&            EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][DuUnpd]:%<%%%:(e)k&                 EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞n&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<%:(ng)i↞n&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ken&       EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞ta&   EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<%:(ng)i↞ta&   EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞keta&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<%:(ng)a↞gnek& EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–kenka&      EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞kenka&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–ma&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–ma&         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞ma&        EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–mta&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–mta&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)ge↞mta&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–megnuk&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–megnuk&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞megnuk&    EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
-[N][Rel][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–mnuk&       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–mnuk&       EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+p|.vet&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞+p|.vet&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞pet&       EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–vet&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–vet&        EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Rel][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+p|.vci&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞+p|.vci&     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞peci&      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞–vci&        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞–vci&        EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Rel][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:%<↞+p|.vtek&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:%<↞+p|.vtek&    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:%<%%%:(e)g↞petek&     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |

LEXICON Ignorative
nate[Ignorative]:nate                           NounInflection; ! what part?; some part; a certain part
